Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1413
Initiative and referendum measures; publication required; rate.

Immediately preceding any general election at which any initiative or referendum measure is to be submitted to the registered voters, the Secretary of State shall cause to be published in all legal newspapers in the state once each week for three consecutive weeks a true copy of the ballot title and text and the number of each measure to be submitted in the form in which the measure will be printed on the official ballot. The publication shall be at a rate charged as provided in section 33-141.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 395.

This section is not applicable to amendments to the Constitution proposed by the Legislature. State ex rel. Hall v. Cline, 118 Neb. 150, 224 N.W. 6 (1929).